Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
CHAPTER 281A Commercial Driver’s Licenses
281A.160.
Testing of knowledge and skills — Fees — State Police CDL skills-testing fund — Contract examiners — Reinstatement — Administrative regulations.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the State Police shall be responsible for administering both the knowledge and skills test required by KRS

281A.130

.

Applicants who fail the written knowledge test shall be permitted to retake the written test on the next day the tests are administered. Applicants who fail the written test six (6) times shall be required to wait three (3) days before taking the knowledge test again. Applicants who subsequently fail the written test three (3) additional times shall be required to wait three (3) days prior to retaking the test.

Except as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, at the time a CDL permit is issued:

An applicant who has held a Kentucky operator’s license for thirty (30) days or longer shall pay a skills-testing fee of fifty dollars ($50); and

An applicant who has held a Kentucky operator’s license for less than thirty (30) days shall pay a skills-testing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

There is created within the State Treasury a trust fund to be known as the State Police CDL skills-testing fund. The fund shall be administered by the State Police and shall receive all skills-testing and retesting fees collected under subsections (2)(a) and (6)(e) of this section, in addition to any grants, gifts, or appropriations of state or federal moneys and any interest earned on moneys in the fund. Moneys in the fund shall not lapse and shall be carried forward to the next succeeding fiscal year. The State Police CDL skills-testing fund shall be used by the State Police to contract with and train civilian CDL skills examiners and to improve the logistics of the CDL skills-testing process.

The State Police, upon request of an applicant who has passed both the vision and knowledge tests, may schedule the applicant for the skills test at the first available test date at a test site designated by the State Police but not less than fourteen (14) days after the applicant has filed the application and been issued a CDL permit. Except in extenuating circumstances, a retest for a failed portion of the skills test shall be given within three (3) days of a request of a retest.

An applicant shall provide a class representative commercial vehicle, for the class of CDL for which the applicant is testing, in which to take the skills test. Unless the State Police grant an exemption at the time the application for testing is made, the vehicle supplied under this paragraph shall be unloaded. Upon arrival for the skills test, the applicant shall have in his or her possession a valid Kentucky operator’s license and a valid CDL permit. A CDL-licensed driver who is at least twenty-one (21) years old shall accompany the applicant at all times the applicant is in operation of a commercial vehicle.

A testing fee shall not be charged to:

An individual applying for a CDL with an “S” endorsement as defined in KRS

281A.170

; or

Military personnel applying for a CDL under KRS

281A.165

.

The State Police may authorize a third party to administer the skills test specified by this section if:

The test is the same that would otherwise be administered by the state; and

The third party has entered into an agreement with this Commonwealth which complies with requirements of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 383.75, as adopted by the Transportation Cabinet.

The State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A that establish procedures that ensure an arm’s-length relationship is maintained between a third-party tester and any owner, officer, or employee of any program offering commercial truck driving under the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or a proprietary school licensed under KRS Chapter 165A.

Applicants shall be permitted to take the skills test for a particular class vehicle an unlimited number of times; however, an applicant shall not retest more than one (1) time in any twenty-four (24) hour period.

The skills test shall consist of three (3) separate portions: pre-trip inspection, basic maneuvering, and road skills. An applicant must achieve a score of at least eighty percent (80%) on each portion of the skills test before a CDL may be issued to the applicant. An applicant who passes one (1) or more portions of the skills test but does not pass all portions of the skills test shall retest only on those portions of the skills test the applicant failed.

An applicant who fails any portion of the skills test four (4) times shall be notified by the State Police that the applicant is required to wait one (1) week before retaking a portion of this skills test again.

Failure of an applicant to notify the State Police at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to missing an appointment for a skills test, or provide a written medical excuse from a licensed physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician’s assistant, shall be considered a failure, on all parts of the skills test scheduled to be given, for the purposes of determining number of failures, waiting periods, and retesting fees under paragraphs (c) and (e) of this subsection for individual applicants. The fees for a missed appointment failure shall be forfeited and retained in the State Police CDL skills-testing fund established under this section. If the forty-eight (48) hour notice or medical excuse is given, the fee shall be applied to the rescheduled test. A missed appointment failure under this paragraph shall not be reported as a failure to the board.

Except as provided for in paragraph (d) of this subsection, at the time of application for a retest under this subsection, the applicant shall pay a retesting fee of fifty dollars ($50).

An applicant who seeks reinstatement of a commercial driver’s license after a suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification of less than one (1) year shall pay the reinstatement fee as prescribed by KRS 281A.150(7) and shall receive his or her commercial driver’s license with all endorsement and restrictions that were in effect at the time of suspension. An applicant who seeks reinstatement of a commercial driver’s license after a suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification of one (1) year or more shall submit to the skills, knowledge, and vision tests.

Subject to paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, a person who possessed a Kentucky commercial driver’s license that has expired for a period of less than five (5) years and was not subject to suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification for any reason at the time of expiration may have that license reinstated, with all endorsements, without submitting to the skills and knowledge tests by applying to the cabinet for renewal. Upon submission of medical certification, driver self-certifications required under KRS 281A.140(1)(f), successful completion of any necessary criminal background check, and review of the person’s driving history record, the cabinet shall issue a renewal CDL, with all endorsements, to an applicant under this paragraph.

A person who otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection whose CDL was subject to suspension or revocation solely for failure to provide medical certification may apply for renewal of a CDL under paragraph (b) of this subsection.

If the CDL held by a person who otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection carried a hazardous materials endorsement, and the applicant wishes to retain that endorsement, he or she shall complete any examinations required for a hazardous materials endorsement renewal in KRS 281A.180(2) prior to renewing the CDL under paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

The State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to set forth the qualifications for contract examiners retained under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 16, effective January 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 11, § 1, effective February 20, 1992; 1992, ch. 274, § 10, effective April 7, 1992; 1994, ch. 135, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 204, § 8, effective April 5, 2002; 2006, ch. 233, § 1, effective April 22, 2006; 2007, ch. 28, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 288, effective June 26, 2007; § 38; 2018 ch. 150, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 153, § 1, effective April 8, 2022.

281A.165.
Waiver of driving skills test for military personnel.

The cabinet may waive the driving skills test for an applicant on active or reserve military service, or who is a member of the National Guard, or within one (1) year of separation of service, who:

Is currently licensed;

Has experience driving a vehicle in the military that would require a commercial driver’s license to operate as a civilian;

Has a good driving record; and

Certifies and provides verification that, during the two (2) year period immediately prior to applying for a commercial driver’s license, the applicant:

Drove a motor vehicle in the military that was representative of the commercial driver’s license class and endorsement for which he or she is applying;

Has not had his or her operator’s license or commercial driver’s license suspended, revoked, or canceled, or been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;

Has not been convicted of any of the disqualifying offenses in 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.51(b) while operating a commercial motor vehicle, or of any offense in a noncommercial vehicle that would be disqualifying under 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.51(b) if committed in a commercial motor vehicle;

Has not been convicted of more than one (1) serious traffic violation, as defined in 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.5, while operating any type of motor vehicle;

Has not been convicted of any violation of military, state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with a traffic accident, and has no record of being at fault in an accident while driving a vehicle in the military that would require a commercial driver’s license to operate as a civilian;

Has not been convicted of any motor vehicle traffic violation that resulted in an accident; and

Is or was regularly employed in a position in the Armed Forces of the United States requiring operation of a commercial motor vehicle of the group the applicant seeks to drive, and provides evidence of that employment in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.

The skills test waiver process described in subsection (1) of this section shall be completed, and the commercial driver’s license issued, within one (1) year of separation of service.

Military personnel who obtain the skills test waiver under this section shall be required to take the knowledge test pursuant to KRS

281A.130

.

Military personnel who obtain the skills test waiver under this section shall be required to pay the application fee as prescribed by KRS

281A.150

, but shall not be charged the skills-testing fee as prescribed by KRS

281A.160

.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A that establish an application form for waiver of the skills test by military personnel. As part of the application process, the applicant shall be required to provide:

A copy of the applicant’s DD-214 form showing the applicant’s military occupational specialty; or

A signed statement by the applicant’s commanding officer or transportation officer, on a form provided by the cabinet, attesting to the fact that the applicant meets the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 20, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 135, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

281A.170.
Form of licenses — Use for federal identification purposes — Limitations on licenses — Administrative regulations — Expiration.

The commercial driver’s license shall be marked “commercial driver’s license” and “CDL” and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper proof. It shall include but is not limited to the following information:

The name and present resident address of the licensee;

The licensee’s color photograph;

A physical description of the licensee including sex, height, weight, and eye color;

The licensee’s date of birth;

The licensee’s signature;

The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that the person is authorized to drive together with any endorsements or restrictions;

The name of this state;

The dates between which the license is valid; and

Any other information required by the cabinet, except for a person’s Social Security number.

A commercial driver’s license issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation that either:

The commercial driver’s license is a voluntary travel ID identity document that complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II, and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or

The commercial driver’s license shall not be used for federal identification purposes.

A commercial driver’s license shall be issued with classifications, endorsements, and restrictions. Vehicles that require an endorsement shall not be driven unless the proper endorsement appears on the license and the applicant has passed the knowledge and skills test required by the State Police.

Classifications:

Class A-Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or more, if the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle being towed is in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. Licensees with an “A” classification may with the proper endorsement drive Class B and C vehicles.

Class B-Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or more, and any vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. Licensees with a “B” classification may with the proper endorsements drive Class C vehicles.

Class C-Any single vehicle with a gross weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or any vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds which includes:

Vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver; or

Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials which requires the vehicle to be placarded under Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 172, sub-part F, as adopted by administrative regulations of the cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

Class D-All other vehicles not listed in any other class.

Class E-Moped only.

Class M-Motorcycles. Licensees with a “M” classification may also drive Class E vehicles.

Endorsements:

“H”-Authorizes the driver to operate a vehicle transporting hazardous materials.

“T”-Authorizes operation of double trailers and triple trailers in those jurisdictions allowing the operation of triple trailers.

“P”-Authorizes operation of vehicles carrying passengers.

“N”-Authorizes operation of tank vehicles.

“X”-Authorizes operation of combination of hazardous materials and tank vehicle endorsements.

“R”-Authorizes operation of all other endorsements not otherwise specified.

“S”-Authorizes operation of school buses.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to outline restrictions on the operation of commercial vehicles and the associated codes to identify such restrictions, which shall appear on the face of the commercial driver’s license.

Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver’s license, the cabinet shall notify the commercial driver’s license information system of that fact, providing all information required to ensure identification of the person.

A commercial driver’s license issued to a resident pursuant to this chapter shall expire in eight (8) years unless the license was issued to a resident under the age of twenty-one (21). A commercial driver’s license issued to a person who is not a resident shall be issued for one (1) year and shall not be renewable. The fee for a commercial driver’s license issued to a nonresident shall be the same as the fee charged to a resident.

A person under the age of twenty-one (21) shall not be licensed to operate a Class A, B, or C vehicle unless he has an “I” restriction. A commercial driver with an “I” restriction shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce, unless he is exempt pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 391.2. A commercial driver under the age of twenty-one (21) shall not be allowed to operate a school bus or a vehicle transporting hazardous material in intrastate commerce.

The holder of a commercial driver’s license shall be considered to hold a valid Kentucky driver’s license issued under the provisions of KRS

186.4102

and

186.412

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 17, effective July 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 5, effective April 7, 1992; 1994, ch. 481, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 204, § 9, effective April 5, 2002; 2005, ch. 165, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 28, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 21, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 100, § 32, effective January 1, 2019; 2018 ch. 135, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 135, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

281A.175.
Requirements for school bus endorsement.

An applicant for a school bus endorsement shall satisfy the following requirements:

Qualify for a passenger vehicle endorsement by passing the knowledge and skills test for obtaining a passenger vehicle endorsement;

Demonstrate knowledge of loading and unloading children, including the safe operation of stop signal devices, external mirror systems, flashing lights, and other warning and safety devices required for school buses by state or federal law or regulation;

Demonstrate knowledge of emergency exits and procedures for safely evacuating passengers in an emergency;

Demonstrate knowledge of state and federal laws and regulations related to safely traversing highway rail grade crossings; and

Submit to an annual physical examination in accordance with 49 C.F.R. pt. 391, completed by a medical examiner as defined by 49 C.F.R. pt. 390.

An applicant for a school bus endorsement shall take a driving skills test in a school bus of the same vehicle group as the school bus the applicant will drive.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 165, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 21, § 5, effective June 25, 2013.

281A.180.
Renewal or transfer — Application for endorsement.

Every person applying for renewal or transfer of a commercial driver’s license from another issuing jurisdiction, shall complete an application as required by KRS

281A.140

, providing updated information, testing, and required certifications.

If a person applies for a renewal or transfer of a commercial driver’s license or seeks to add an endorsement, or has a hazardous materials endorsement and applies to retain the endorsement, he shall provide the required medical certificate and take the knowledge test for a hazardous materials endorsement again, unless he provides proof that he has taken and passed the hazardous materials knowledge test within the preceding two (2) years.

Every person applying to add an endorsement to his existing commercial driver’s license shall complete an application as required by KRS

281A.140

, providing updated information and certifications. If the endorsement originally would have required a special knowledge or skills test, he shall successfully complete the test or tests prior to the endorsement being added to his commercial driver’s license.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 18, effective July 1, 1991; 2002, ch. 204, § 10, effective April 5, 2002.

281A.185.
Masking, delaying, or diverting CDL holder’s conviction for violation of state or local traffic control law prohibited — Exemptions.

The Commonwealth shall not mask, defer imposition of judgment, or allow an individual to enter into a diversion program that would prevent a CDL holder’s conviction for any violation, in any type of motor vehicle, of a state or local traffic control law from appearing on the CDLIS driver record, whether the driver was convicted for an offense committed in the Commonwealth or another state.

This section shall not apply to the following violations:

Parking;

Vehicle weight; or

Vehicle defect.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 135, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

281A.190.
Disqualification — Suspension, revocation, or cancellation — Right to appeal.

A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year if convicted of:

Driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance;

Driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood or breath or urine is four hundredths (0.04) or more;

Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle driven by a person who holds or is required to hold a CDL;

Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony listed in KRS

186.560

;

Refusing to submit to testing as required by KRS

281A.220

when driving a motor vehicle;

Committing a first violation of driving a commercial motor vehicle while the person’s commercial driver’s license is revoked, suspended, or canceled, or when the person is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle; or

Causing a fatality through negligent or criminal operation of a commercial motor vehicle.

A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL shall be disqualified for life if convicted of two (2) or more violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this section or any combination of those offenses, arising from two (2) or more separate incidents. The provisions of this subsection shall only apply to convictions that occurred after the disqualification dates established by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration. The Transportation Cabinet shall set forth those dates in an administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

If any violation specified in subsection (1) of this section occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded, the person who holds or is required to hold a CDL shall be disqualified for a period of three (3) years.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a period of suspension, revocation, or disqualification imposed under the provisions of this chapter shall not be reduced. However, in accordance with the provisions of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 383, the cabinet may establish guidelines including conditions under which a disqualification of not less than ten (10) years may be imposed.

A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life who uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance.

A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days if convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations, or one hundred twenty (120) days consecutively if convicted of three (3) serious traffic violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle arising from separate incidents occurring within a three (3) year period.

A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL shall be disqualified for the first offense from driving a commercial motor vehicle for six (6) months if the person has been convicted of committing any of those offenses enumerated in KRS

186.610

involving a commercial motor vehicle, commercial driver’s license, or application for that license. For the second and each subsequent offense, the person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year.

The cabinet shall deny a person a commercial driver’s license or shall suspend, revoke, or cancel his commercial driving privilege, subject to a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS

189A.107

, when the cabinet has reason to believe that the person refused to submit to a test to determine his alcohol concentration while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

If a person who holds or is required to hold a CDL is convicted of any of the railroad crossing offenses or conduct enumerated in KRS

189.500

,

189.560

, and

189.565

, then the person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of:

Sixty (60) days for the first offense;

One hundred twenty (120) days for the second offense within a three (3) year period; and

One (1) year for the third or subsequent offense within a three (3) year period.

If a person who holds or is required to hold a CDL violates an out-of-service order while transporting nonhazardous materials, then the person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of:

Ninety (90) days for the first offense;

One (1) year for the second offense in a separate incident within a ten (10) year period; and

Three (3) years for the third or subsequent offense in a separate incident within a ten (10) year period.

If a person who holds or is required to hold a CDL violates an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under the 49

U.S.C. sec. 5101

et seq., or operating a commercial motor vehicle designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver, then the person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of:

One hundred eighty (180) days for the first offense; and

Three (3) years for the second or subsequent offense in a separate incident within a ten (10) year period.

A person who violates the provisions of KRS

281A.205

shall be fined fifty dollars ($50) for the first offense. For a subsequent offense, a violator shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) and shall have his or her school bus endorsement suspended for a period of six (6) months.

After disqualifying a commercial driver’s license holder or suspending, revoking, or canceling a commercial driver’s license, the Transportation Cabinet shall update its records to reflect that action within ten (10) days of receipt. After disqualifying a commercial driver’s license holder or suspending, revoking, or canceling an out-of-state commercial driver’s license holder’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle for at least sixty (60) days, the Transportation Cabinet shall notify the licensing authority of the state which issued the commercial driver’s license or commercial driver’s instruction permit with this information within ten (10) days. The notification shall include both the disqualification and the violation that resulted in the disqualification, suspension, cancellation, or revocation.

Upon notice from the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration that a driver has been determined to be an imminent hazard and has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle, the cabinet shall act in accordance with the provisions of 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.52. The cabinet shall notify the driver of the disqualification, which shall not exceed one (1) year in duration, and of the right to appeal to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration in accordance with 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.52.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 19, effective July 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 6, effective April 7, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 210, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 165, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 28, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 138, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

281A.200.
Application made between January 1, 1991, and April 1, 1992 — Expiration — Fees prorated — Medical waiver. [Repealed.]

281A.205.
Operation of school bus while using cellular telephone prohibited — Exceptions.

As used in this section, “cellular telephone” means a cellular, analog, wireless, or digital telephone.

A person shall not operate a school bus, as defined in KRS

281A.010

, on any highway while using a cellular telephone while the bus is in motion and transporting one (1) or more children, except for communications made to and from a central dispatch, school transportation department, or its equivalent when the bus is not equipped with a functioning two (2) way radio.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a person operating a school bus shall be allowed to use a cellular telephone in the event of a bona fide emergency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

281A.210.
Operating commercial vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other controlled substance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle within this state while having any measurable or detectable amount of alcohol or other controlled substances in his system.

A person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this state while having any detectable amount of alcohol or controlled substance in his system or who refuses to submit to the test required in KRS

281A.220

, shall be placed out of service for twenty-four (24) hours.

A person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this state with an alcohol concentration of four hundredths (0.04) or more shall be deemed to be operating a vehicle under the influence.

A person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this state with an alcohol concentration of four hundredths (0.04) or more, or who refused to submit to the test required in KRS

281A.220

, in addition to any other sanctions that may be imposed under this chapter shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under KRS

281A.190

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 21, effective July 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 7, effective April 7, 1992.

281A.2102.
Additional penalties for driving commercial motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol.

In addition to the penalties established by this chapter for driving a commercial motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol:

Any person convicted of driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood or breath is four hundredths (0.04) to eight hundredths (0.08) shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) and not more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any person convicted of driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood or breath is greater than eight hundredths (0.08) shall be fined under the provisions of KRS 189A.010(5)(a) to (d).

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 446, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 467, § 23, effective October 1, 2000.

281A.220.
Testing to determine alcohol concentration or presence of other controlled substances.

A person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this state shall be deemed to have given his consent to take a test or tests of his blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining alcohol concentration, or the presence of other drugs.

A test or tests may be administered in accordance with the provisions of KRS

189A.103

at the direction of a law enforcement officer, who after stopping or detaining the commercial motor vehicle driver has reasonable cause to believe that driver was driving a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol or drugs in his system. A urine test shall be a test of last resort under the provisions of this section. The pretrial suspension provisions and implied consent provisions of KRS Chapter 189A shall be applicable to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 22, effective July 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 8, effective April 7, 1992.

281A.230.
Preliminary breath test — Field sobriety test.

Law enforcement agencies may administer preliminary breath tests using devices or equipment which shall ensure an accurate determination of alcohol concentration. The tests may be administered in the field to a person suspected of operating a commercial vehicle in violation of KRS

281A.210

before the person is arrested. These tests may be administered in addition to any other blood alcohol level test authorized by law. A person’s refusal to take a preliminary breath test shall not be used against him in a court of law nor in any administrative proceeding for a license suspension. This preliminary test shall not be in lieu of any requested blood, urine, or breath test required by any other statute.

Law enforcement agencies may record on film or video tape or by other visual or audible means field sobriety tests administered at the scene of an arrest for violation of KRS

281A.210

or such tests at a police station, jail, or other suitable facility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 23, effective July 1, 1991.

281A.240.
Recognition of commercial driver’s license or permit of foreign jurisdiction — Effect of foreign convictions.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this state if the person has a valid commercial driver’s license or commercial driver’s license instruction permit issued by any state, Canada, or Mexico in accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance of commercial motor vehicle driver’s license, if the person’s driving privilege is not suspended, revoked, or canceled; and if the person is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle or subject to an out-of-service order.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall give all out-of-state convictions full faith and credit and treat them for sanctioning purposes under this chapter as if they occurred in this state. Except as otherwise provided, when in this chapter reference is made to an offense which is a violation of a provision of this chapter or other Kentucky state law, the reference shall be deemed to include offenses under any local ordinance, any federal law, any law or local ordinance of another state substantially similar to any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 24, effective July 1, 1991; 2007, ch. 28, § 8, effective June 26, 2007.

281A.250.
Nonresident commercial driver’s license. [Repealed.]

281A.260.
Agreements to aid in administration of chapter.

The Commonwealth may enter into or make agreements, arrangements, or declarations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 26, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.270.
Adoption of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 383.

The Transportation Cabinet may adopt in whole or in part those federally mandated requirements set forth in Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 383, notwithstanding the fact that the provisions may conflict with other provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 34, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 28, § 9, effective June 26, 2007.

281A.280.
Short title for KRS 281A.010 to 281A.280.

KRS

281A.010

to

281A.280

shall be known as the “Kentucky Commercial Driver’s License Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 38, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.290.
Prohibition against termination of certain Transportation Cabinet employees for failure to hold commercial driver’s license — Exception — Requirement for employment.

The Transportation Cabinet shall not terminate the services of any employee in a job classification which requires a valid commercial driver’s license if:

The employee has never held an operator’s license;

The employee is not eligible for a medical waiver to operate a commercial vehicle;

The employee’s driving record as of March 31, 1992, precludes the issuance of a commercial driver’s license;

The employee’s job description, as of April 1, 1992, does not require a commercial driver’s license;

The employee retires by December 31, 1992.

The Transportation Cabinet may terminate the employment of any employee whose job classification requires a commercial driver’s license as of April 1, 1992, if the employee holds a valid Kentucky driver’s license, but has failed to apply for a commercial driver’s license and refuses to make an effort to take the necessary tests to obtain a commercial driver’s license.

The Transportation Cabinet shall not require a person to possess a commercial driver’s license at the time of employment, but any employee who is required to obtain a commercial driver’s license as a requirement for a job classification shall obtain the license prior to the expiration of the employee’s six (6) month probationary period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 411, § 1, effective April 10, 1992.